Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 6C Hospital Medicaid Financing Program

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 2-1/HB 1055, effective June 30, 2013, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this article. The former article consisted of Code Sections

31-8-179

and

31-8-179

.1 through 31-8-179.8, relating to provider payment agreements, and was based on Code 1981, §§ 31-8-179—31-8-179.8, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 2-1/HB 1055; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 31/HB 142.

Code Section 31-8-179.6 provides for the repeal of this article effective June 30, 2025.

31-8-179.
[Repealed effective June 30, 2025] Short title.

This article is enacted pursuant to the authority of Article III, Section IX, Paragraph VI(i) of the Constitution and shall be known and may be cited as the “Hospital Medicaid Financing Program Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-179

, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 1, § 1/SB 24.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2013 enactment of this Code section, see 30 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 153 (2013).

31-8-179.1.
[Repealed effective June 30, 2025] Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Board” means the Board of Community Health.

“Department” means the Department of Community Health.

“Hospital” means an institution licensed pursuant to Chapter 7 of this title which is primarily engaged in providing to inpatients, by or under the supervision of physicians, diagnostic services and therapeutic services for medical diagnosis, treatment, and care of injured, disabled, or sick persons or rehabilitation services for the rehabilitation of injured, disabled, or sick persons. Such term includes public, private, rehabilitative, geriatric, osteopathic, and other specialty hospitals but shall not include psychiatric hospitals which shall have the same meaning as facilities as defined in paragraph (7) of Code Section 37-3-1, critical access hospitals as defined in paragraph (3) of Code Section 33-21A-2, or any state owned or state operated hospitals.

“Provider payment” means a payment assessed by the department pursuant to this article for the privilege of operating a hospital.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-179.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 1, § 1/SB 24.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2013 enactment of this Code section, see 30 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 153 (2013).

31-8-179.2.
[Repealed effective June 30, 2025] Department of Community Health authorized to assess one or more provider payments on hospitals for the purpose of obtaining federal financial participation for Medicaid.

The board shall be authorized to establish and assess, by board rule, one or more provider payments on hospitals, or a subclass of hospitals, as defined by the board; provided, however, that if any such provider payment is established and assessed, the provider payment shall comply with the requirements of 42 C.F.R. 433.68. Any provider payment assessed pursuant to this article shall not exceed the amount necessary to obtain federal financial participation allowable under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act. The aggregate amount of any fees established and assessed pursuant to this subsection shall not exceed those percentages of net patient revenues set forth in the General Appropriations Act. The board shall be authorized to discontinue any provider payment assessed pursuant to this article. The board shall cease to impose any such provider payment if:

The provider payments are not eligible for federal matching funds under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act; or

The department reduces Medicaid payment rates to hospitals as are in effect on June 30, 2012, or reduces the provider payment rate adjustment factors utilized in developing the state Fiscal Year 2013 capitated rates for Medicaid managed care organizations.

(a.1)

The General Assembly shall have the authority to override any provider payment assessed by the board pursuant to this Code section in accordance with the procedures contained in subsection (f) of Code Section 50-13-4.

The board shall be authorized to establish rules and regulations to assess and collect any such provider payments, including, but not limited to, payment frequency and schedules, required information to be submitted, record retention, and whether any such provider payment shall be credited toward any indigent or charity care requirements or considered a community benefit.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-179.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 1, § 1/SB 24; Ga. L. 2013, p. 1037, § 2/SB 62; Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 31/SB 340.

U.S. Code.

Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 1396

et seq.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2013 enactment of this Code section, see 30 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 153 (2013).

31-8-179.3.
[Repealed effective June 30, 2025] Provider payments assessed to be deposited in segregated accounts within Indigent Care Trust Fund; sole purpose of funds to obtain federal financial participation for medical assistance payments for Medicaid recipients; retention and inspection of records; penalties.

Any provider payments assessed pursuant to this article shall be deposited into a segregated account for each payment program within the Indigent Care Trust Fund created pursuant to Code Section 31-8-152. No other funds shall be deposited into any such segregated account or accounts. All funds in any such segregated account or accounts shall be invested in the same manner as authorized for investing other moneys in the state treasury. Any funds deposited into a segregated account pursuant to this article shall be subject to appropriation by the General Assembly.

Any provider payments assessed pursuant to this article shall be dedicated and used for the sole purpose of obtaining federal financial participation for medical assistance payments to providers on behalf of Medicaid recipients pursuant to Article 7 of Chapter 4 of Title 49.

Each hospital shall keep and preserve for a period of seven years such books and records as may be necessary to determine the amount for which it is liable under this article. The department shall have the authority to inspect and copy the records of a hospital for purposes of auditing the calculation of the provider payment. All information obtained by the department pursuant to this article shall be confidential and shall not constitute a public record.

The department shall be authorized to impose a penalty of up to 6 percent for any hospital that fails to pay a provider payment within the time required by the department for each month or fraction thereof that the provider payment is overdue. If a required provider payment has not been received by the department in accordance with department timelines, the department shall withhold an amount equal to the provider payment and penalty owed from any medical assistance payment due such hospital under the Medicaid program. Any provider payment assessed pursuant to this article shall constitute a debt due the state and may be collected by civil action and the filing of tax liens in addition to such methods provided for in this article. Any penalty that accrues pursuant to this subsection shall be credited to the applicable segregated account.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-179.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 1, § 1/SB 24.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2013 enactment of this Code section, see 30 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 153 (2013).

31-8-179.4.
[Repealed effective June 30, 2025] Authorized use of appropriated funds.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the General Assembly is authorized to appropriate as state funds to the department for use in any fiscal year all revenues dedicated and deposited into one or more segregated accounts. Such appropriations shall be authorized to be made for the sole purpose of obtaining federal financial participation for medical assistance payments to providers on behalf of Medicaid recipients pursuant to Article 7 of Chapter 4 of Title 49. Any appropriation from a segregated account for any purpose other than such medical assistance payments shall be void.

Revenues appropriated to the department pursuant to this Code section shall be used to match federal funds that are available for the purpose for which such funds have been appropriated.

Appropriations from a segregated account to the department shall not lapse to the general fund at the end of the fiscal year.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-179.4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 1, § 1/SB 24.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2013 enactment of this Code section, see 30 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 153 (2013).

31-8-179.5.
[Repealed effective June 30, 2025] Applicability of Georgia Medical Assistance Act.

Except where inconsistent with this article, the provisions of Article 7 of Chapter 4 of Title 49, the “Georgia Medical Assistance Act of 1977,” shall apply to the department in carrying out the purposes of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-179.5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 1, § 1/SB 24.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2013 enactment of this Code section, see 30 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 153 (2013).

31-8-179.6.
[Repealed effective June 30, 2025] Automatic repeal.

This article shall stand repealed on June 30, 2025, unless reauthorized by the General Assembly prior to that date.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-179.6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 1, § 1/SB 24; Ga. L. 2017, p. 1, § 1/SB 70; Ga. L. 2019, p. 183, § 4/HB 321.

The 2017 amendment,

effective February 13, 2017, substituted “June 30, 2020” for “June 30, 2017”.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 25, 2019, substituted “June 30, 2025” for “June 30, 2020” in this Code section.